ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.aff
SFX T N 358
SFX T   0     sta         [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunata      .
SFX T   0     kuná        .
SFX T   a     ás          [^aeiou]a
SFX T   e     és          [^aeiou]e
SFX T   i     ís          [^aeiou]i
SFX T   o     ós          [^aeiou]o
SFX T   u     ús          [^aeiou]u
SFX T   aa    áas         aa
SFX T   ae    áes         ae
SFX T   ai    éis         ai
SFX T   ao    éos         ao
SFX T   au    éus         au
SFX T   ea    éas         ea
SFX T   ee    ées         ee
SFX T   ei    éis         ei
SFX T   eo    éos         eo
SFX T   eu    éus         eu
SFX T   ia    ías         ia
SFX T   ie    íes         ie
SFX T   ii    íis         ii
SFX T   io    íos         io
SFX T   iu    íus         iu
SFX T   oa    óas         oa
SFX T   oe    óes         oe
SFX T   oi    úóis        oi
SFX T   oo    óos         oo
SFX T   ou    óus         ou
SFX T   ua    úas         ua
SFX T   ue    úes         ue
SFX T   ui    úis         ui
SFX T   uo    úos         uo
SFX T   uu    úus         uu
SFX T   0     staqa       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapaj      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stataj      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapis      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stari       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stamá       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stachá      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stachus     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stachu      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     staraj      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawan      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapuni     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     staña       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjawata     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spita       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinata     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunataqa    .
SFX T   0     kunatapaj   .
SFX T   0     kunatataj   .
SFX T   0     kunatapis   .
SFX T   0     kunatari    .
SFX T   0     kunatamá    .
SFX T   0     kunatachá   .
SFX T   0     kunatachus  .
SFX T   0     kunatachu   .
SFX T   0     kunataraj   .
SFX T   0     kunatawan   .
SFX T   0     kunatapuni  .
SFX T   0     kunataña    .
SFX T   0     kunajawata  .
SFX T   0     kunapita    .
SFX T   0     kunajinata  .
SFX T   0     sqá         [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spáj        [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stáj        [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spís        [aeiou]
SFX T   0     srí         [aeiou]
SFX T   0     schús       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     schú        [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sráj        [aeiou]
SFX T   0     swán        [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spuní       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sñá         [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjawá       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spí         [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjiná       [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunaqá      .
SFX T   0     kunapáj     .
SFX T   0     kunatáj     .
SFX T   0     kunapís     .
SFX T   0     kunarí      .
SFX T   0     kunachús    .
SFX T   0     kunachú     .
SFX T   0     kunaráj     .
SFX T   0     kunawán     .
SFX T   0     kunapuní    .
SFX T   0     kunañá      .
SFX T   0     kunasiná    .
SFX T   0     kunajawá    .
SFX T   0     kunapí      .
SFX T   0     kunajiná    .
SFX T   0     staqachu    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapajchu   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     statajchu   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapichu    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stajawachu  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapischu   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starichu    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starajchu   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanchu   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapunichu  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stañachu    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatachu  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunataqachu .
SFX T   0     kunatapajchu .
SFX T   0     kunatatajchu .
SFX T   0     kunatapichu .
SFX T   0     kunatajawachu .
SFX T   0     kunatapischu .
SFX T   0     kunatarichu .
SFX T   0     kunatarajchu .
SFX T   0     kunatawanchu .
SFX T   0     kunatapunichu .
SFX T   0     kunatañachu .
SFX T   0     kunajinatachu .
SFX T   0     staqachá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapajchá   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     statajchá   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapichá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stajawachá  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapischá   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starichá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starajchá   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanchá   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapunichá  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stañachá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatachá  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunataqachá .
SFX T   0     kunatapajchá .
SFX T   0     kunatatajchá .
SFX T   0     kunatapichá .
SFX T   0     kunatajawachá .
SFX T   0     kunatapischá .
SFX T   0     kunatarichá .
SFX T   0     kunatarajchá .
SFX T   0     kunatawanchá .
SFX T   0     kunatapunichá .
SFX T   0     kunatañachá .
SFX T   0     kunajinatachá .
SFX T   0     staqachus   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapajchus  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     statajchus  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapichus   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stajawachus [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapischus  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starichus   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starajchus  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanchus  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapunichus [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stañachus   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatachus [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunataqachus .
SFX T   0     kunatapajchus .
SFX T   0     kunatatajchus .
SFX T   0     kunatapichus .
SFX T   0     kunatajawachus .
SFX T   0     kunatapischus .
SFX T   0     kunatarichus .
SFX T   0     kunatarajchus .
SFX T   0     kunatawanchus .
SFX T   0     kunatapunichus .
SFX T   0     kunatañachus .
SFX T   0     kunajinatachus .
SFX T   0     sjinataqa   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatapaj  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spijinata   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatataj  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatajawa [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatari   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinataraj  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatawan  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinatapuni [aeiou]
SFX T   0     sjinataña   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunajinataqa .
SFX T   0     kunajinatapaj .
SFX T   0     kunapijinata .
SFX T   0     kunajinatataj .
SFX T   0     kunajinatajawa .
SFX T   0     kunajinatapis .
SFX T   0     kunajinatari .
SFX T   0     kunajinataraj .
SFX T   0     kunajinatawan .
SFX T   0     kunajinatapuni .
SFX T   0     kunajinataña .
SFX T   0     spitaqa     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitapaj    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitataj    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitapis    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitari     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitamá     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitaraj    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitawan    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitapuni   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitaña     [aeiou]
SFX T   0     spitajawa   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunapitaqa  .
SFX T   0     kunapitapaj .
SFX T   0     kunapitataj .
SFX T   0     kunapitapis .
SFX T   0     kunapitari  .
SFX T   0     kunapitaraj .
SFX T   0     kunapitawan .
SFX T   0     kunapitapuni .
SFX T   0     kunapitaña  .
SFX T   0     kunapitajawa .
SFX T   0     stapisqa    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapajpis   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapistaj   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapis      [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapisri    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapismá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starajpis   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanpis   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapispuni  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stañapis    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stajawapis  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunatapisqa .
SFX T   0     kunatapajpis .
SFX T   0     kunatapistaj .
SFX T   0     kunatapis   .
SFX T   0     kunatapisri .
SFX T   0     kunatapismá .
SFX T   0     kunatarajpis .
SFX T   0     kunatawanpis .
SFX T   0     kunatapispuni .
SFX T   0     kunatañapis .
SFX T   0     kunatajawapis .
SFX T   0     stawanqa    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapajwan   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawantaj   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanri    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanmá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starajwan   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanpuni  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stawanña    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stajawawan  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     kunatawanqa .
SFX T   0     kunatapajwan .
SFX T   0     kunatawantaj .
SFX T   0     kunatawanri .
SFX T   0     kunatawanmá .
SFX T   0     kunatarajwan .
SFX T   0     kunatawanpuni .
SFX T   0     kunatawanña .
SFX T   0     kunatajawawan .
SFX T   0     statajqa    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     stapajtaj   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     staritaj    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     statajmá    [aeiou]
SFX T   0     starajtaj   [aeiou]
SFX T   0     statajpuni  [aeiou]
SFX T   0     statajña    [aeiou]
